Utah statutes.
53-6-202.   Basic training course -- Completion required -- Annual training -- Prohibition from exercising powers -- Reinstatement.

(1) (a)  The director shall:

(i) (A)  suggest and prepare subject material; and

(B)  schedule instructors for basic training courses; or

(ii)  review the material and instructor choices submitted by a certified academy.

(b)  The subject material, instructors, and schedules shall be approved or disapproved by a majority vote of the council.

(2)  The materials shall be reviewed and approved by the council on or before July 1st of each year and may from time to time be changed or amended by majority vote of the council.

(3)  The basic training in a certified academy shall be appropriate for the basic training of peace officers in the techniques of law enforcement in the discretion of the director.

(4) (a)  All peace officers must satisfactorily complete the basic training course or the waiver process provided for in this chapter as well as annual certified training of not less than 40 hours as the director, with the advice and consent of the council, directs.

(b)  A peace officer who fails to satisfactorily complete the annual training shall automatically be prohibited from exercising peace officer powers until any deficiency is made up.

